incubator/apertium-hi-ur.ur.dix
    <pardef n="حیرت__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="اشتہار__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ات</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ات</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/آخَر__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>آخَر</l>
          <r>آخَر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>آخَر</l>
          <r>آخَر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اَواخِر</l>
          <r>آخَر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اَواخِر</l>
          <r>آخَر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="جہت__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="حیرت"><i>حیرت</i><par n="حیرت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جہت"><i>جہت</i><par n="جہت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="اشتہار"><i>اشتہار</i><par n="اشتہار__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آخَر"><i></i><par n="/آخَر__n"/></e>
